Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,113.08
Handicapped or disabled persons;
parking permit; rules and regulations.

The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to fulfill any duties
and obligations as provided in sections 60-3,113.01 to 60-3,113.08. All rules
and regulations of the department relating
to the issuance and use of handicapped or disabled parking permits adopted and promulgated prior to July 18, 2014, shall
continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant
to law.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 30;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 12.